District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

47-826

Assessments — Power to administer oaths or affirmations and summon witnesses; witness fees; examination of witnesses.

Repealed.

History

Sept. 3, 1974, 88 Stat. 1056, Pub. L. 93-407, title IV, § 427
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
Apr. 4, 2003, D.C. Law 14-282, § 11(i), 50 DCR 896

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-826.
1973 Ed., § 47-647.

Temporary Legislation

For temporary (225 day) repeal of section, see § 12(j) of Tax Clarity and Recorder of Deeds Temporary Act of 2002 (D.C. Law 14-191, October 5, 2002, law notification 49 DCR 9549).
For temporary (225 day) repeal of section, see § 12(j) of Tax Clarity and Related Amendments Temporary Act of 2003 (D.C. Law 14-228, March 23, 2003, law notification 50 DCR 2741).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 12(j) of Tax Clarity and Recorder of Deeds Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-381, June 6, 2002, 49 DCR 5674).
For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 12(j) of Tax Clarity and Related Amendments Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-456, July 23, 2002, 49 DCR 8107).
For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 12(j) of Tax Clarity and Related Amendments Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-510, October 23, 2002, 49 DCR 10247).

References in Text

The Board, referred to in this section, is the Board of Equalization and Review.